District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0360.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Senior Property Tax Aggregation Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section § 47-863(a)(1A) of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) Subparagraph (A)(iii)(I) is amended to read as follows:
“(iii)(I) In which the individual has an ownership interest; provided
that:
“(aa) The individual is 65 years of age or older;


“(bb) The household adjusted gross income is less
than $125,000, increased annually, beginning October 1, 2014, by the senior or disabled cost-of-
living adjustment (if the adjustment does not result in a multiple of $50, rounded to the next
lowest multiple of $50); and
“(cc) At least 50% of the residence is owned, in
whole or in part, by persons living at the residence, including the individual; or”.
(b) Subparagraph (B)(ii) is amended as follows:
(1) The lead-in language is amended to read as follows:
“(ii) In which the individual has an ownership interest; provided
that:”
(2) Sub-sub-subparagraph (I) is amended as follows:
(A) Sub-sub-sub-subparagraph (aa) is amended to read as follows:
“(I)(aa) The individual is 65 years of age or older;”
(B) Sub-sub-sub-subparagraph (bb) is amended as follows:
(i) Strike the phrase “Whose household” and insert the phrase “The
household” in its place.
(ii) Strike the phrase “; or” and insert a semicolon in its place.
(C) A new sub-sub-sub-subparagraph (cc) is added to read as follows:
“(cc) At least 50% of the residence is owned, in
whole or in part, by persons living at the residence, including the individual; or”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.


The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or, in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).